Maryland, session 2026, HB1004.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1004*

HOUSE BILL 1004
21–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(i) “Food” means:
(1) Any substance that is used as food or drink for human beings or as a
component of food or drink for human beings; or
(2) Chewing gum or any substance that is used as a component of chewing
gum.
21–259.4.
A PERSON MAY NOT MANUFACTURE, SELL, DELIVER, HOLD, OR OFFER FOR
SALE FOOD IN THE STATE THAT CONTAINS:
(1) BROMINATED VEGETABLE OIL (CAS NO. 8016–94–2);
(2) POTASSIUM BROMATE (CAS NO. 7758–01–2);
(3) PROPYLPARABEN (CAS NO. 94–13–3);
(4) RED 3 (CAS NO. 16423–68–0); OR
(5) ANY OTHER ANY INGREDIENT OR ADDITIVE THAT IS PROHIBITED
FOR USE IN FOOD UNDER REGULATIONS ADOPTED BY THE U.S. FOOD AND DRUG
ADMINISTRATION OR ANY OTHER FEDERAL LAW OR REGULATION.
21–1215.
(a) This section does not apply to a violation of § 21–220(b)(4), § 21–228, or §
21–259.3 of this title.
(b) A person who violates any provision of Subtitle 2 of this title or any regulation
adopted under Subtitle 2 of this title is guilty of a misdemeanor and on conviction is subject
to:
(1) A fine not exceeding $10,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 1 year or
both; or
(2) If the person has been convicted once of violating Subtitle 2 of this title,
a fine not exceeding $25,000 or imprisonment not exceeding 3 years or both.

HOUSE BILL 1004 3
(c) In addition to any criminal penalties imposed under this section, a person who
violates any provision of Subtitle 2 of this title, any rule or regulation adopted under
Subtitle 2 of this title, or any term, condition, or limitation of any license or registration
issued under Subtitle 2 of this title:
(1) Is subject to a civil penalty not exceeding $5,000, in an action in any
District Court; and
(2) May be enjoined from continuing the violation.
(d) Each day on which a violation occurs is a separate violation under this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2027.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.